sl-SI: Vrsta pasti za živali: Bodygrip/Conibear; Kletka; Kletka/živolovka; Vijačna vzmet; Kolonijska; Za nogo/nogo; Lepilna past; Dolga vzmet; Samoponastavljiva; Zanka; Drugo
pl: Typ pułapki na zwierzęta: Typu Conibear; Skrzynkowa; Żywołapka; Ze sprężyną spiralną; Wielokrotnego chwytu; Na łapy; Lepowa; Ze sprężyną płaską; Samoresetująca; Wnykowa; Inny
fr: Type de piège à animaux: Prise de corps/Conibear; Boîte; Cage/piège vivant; Ressort hélicoïdal; Colonie; Piège à rétention/à mâchoires; Plaque de glu; Ressort long; À réarmement automatique; Collet; Autre
el: Τύπος παγίδας ζώων: Πιάσιμο σώματος/Conibear; Κουτί; Κλουβί/σύλληψης ζωντανών; Σπειροειδές ελατήριο; Αποικίας; Πιάσιμο ποδιού; Κολλητική παγίδα; Μακρύ ελατήριο; Αυτόματης επαναφοράς; Θηλιά; Άλλο
fi: Eläinloukun tyyppi: Conibear / iskevä rauta; Laatikko; Häkki / elävänä pyytävä; Kierrejousi; Monipyyntiloukku; Jalkarauta; Liima-ansa; Pitkäjousirauta; Itsestään virittyvä; Ansalanka; Muu
zh-TW: 動物陷阱類型: 身體夾住/Conibear 陷阱; 盒子陷阱; 誘捕籠/活捉; 螺旋彈簧陷阱; 籠式陷阱; 踏板/夾腿陷阱; 黏膠板; 長彈簧陷阱; 自動重設陷阱; 陷阱套索; 其他
tr: Hayvan tuzağı türü: Gövde tutucu/Conibear; Kutu; Kafes/canlı yakalama; Helezon yay; Koloni; Ayak/Bacak kapanı; Yapışkan levha; Uzun yay; Otomatik sıfırlamalı; İlmik; Diğer
ja: 動物用罠タイプ: ボディグリップ/コニベア; ボックス; ケージ/生け捕り; コイルスプリング; コロニー; フットホールド/レッグホールド; 粘着シート; ロングスプリング; 自動リセット; スネア; その他
vi: Loại bẫy động vật: Kẹp toàn thân/Conibear; Hộp; Lồng/bắt sống; Lò xo xoắn; Bắt theo đàn; Bẫy kẹp chân; Bẫy dính; Lò xo dài; Tự thiết lập lại; Bẫy thòng lọng; Khác
cs: Typ pasti na zvířata: Tělová / typu Conibear; Skřípcová; Klecová/živolovná; S vinutou pružinou; Skupinová; Nášlapná; Lepová deska; S dlouhou pružinou; Samonatahovací; Očko; Jiné
da: Type dyrefælde: Bodygrip/Conibear; Kasse; Bur/levende; Spiralfjeder; Koloni; Fod-/bensaks; Limplade; Lang fjeder; Selv-nulstillende; Snare; Andet
en: Animal trap type: Bodygrip/Conibear; Box; Cage/live; Coil spring; Colony; Foothold/leg-hold; Glue board; Long spring; Self-resetting; Snare; Other
nl: Type dierenval: Bodygrip/Conibear; Kist; Kooi/levend; Schroefveer; Kolonie; Pootklem; Lijmplank; Lange veer; Zelf-resettend; Strik; Overig
hu: Állatcsapda típusa: Testfogó / Conibear; Dobozos; Ketreces / élvefogó; Tekercsrugós; Családfogó; Láb- / csülökfogó; Ragasztós tábla; Hosszú rugós; Önvisszaállító; Hurok; Egyéb
it: Tipo di trappola per animali: Bodygrip/Conibear; A scatola; A gabbia/per cattura dal vivo; A molla elicoidale; A colonia; A tagliola per zampe/gambe; Tavoletta collante; A molla lunga; A ripristino automatico; A laccio; Altro
sk-SK: Typ pasce na zver: Telové/Conibear; Krabicová; Klietková/živolovná; S vinutou pružinou; Skupinová; Nášľapná/na nohu; Lepová doska; S dlhou pružinou; Samonastavovacia; Oko; Iný
pt-PT: Tipo de armadilha para animais: Conibear/aperto no corpo; Caixa; Gaiola/captura viva; Mola helicoidal; Colónia; Captura de pata/perna; Placa de cola; Mola longa; Reposição automática; Laço; Outro
lt-LT: Gyvūnų spąstų tipas: Spąstai kūnui / „Conibear“; Dėžės formos; Narvas / gyvagaudžiai; Spyruokliniai; Kolektyviniai; Spąstai kojai; Lipnioji lenta; Su ilga spyruokle; Automatiškai atsistatantys; Kilpos; Kita
es: Tipo de trampa para animales: Agarre de cuerpo/Conibear; Caja; Jaula/captura viva; Resorte helicoidal; Colonia; Sujeción de pata; Tabla adhesiva; Resorte largo; De reinicio automático; Lazo; Otro
th: ประเภทกับดักสัตว์: กับดักจับตัว/Conibear; กล่อง; กรง/จับเป็น; สปริงขด; กับดักกลุ่ม; กับดักจับเท้า/จับขา; แผ่นกาว; สปริงยาว; รีเซ็ตตัวเอง; บ่วงแร้ว; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип капан за животни: Капан за тяло/Conibear; Кутия; Клетка/за живо улавяне; Спирална пружина; За колонии; За крак/лапа; Лепяща дъска; Дълга пружина; Самовъзстановяващ се; Примка; Друго
sv: Typ av djurfälla: Slagfälla/Conibear; Låda; Bur/levandefångst; Spiralfjäder; Kolonifälla; Trampfälla; Limfälla; Långfjäder; Självåterställande; Snara; Annan
ro-RO: Tipul de capcană pentru animale: Prindere corporală/Conibear; Cutie; Cușcă/capturare vie; Arc elicoidal; Colonie; Prindere de picior; Placă adezivă; Arc lung; Autoresetabilă; Laț; Altele
ko: 동물 덫 유형: 바디그립/코니베어; 상자형; 케이지/생포형; 코일 스프링; 다수 포획형; 풋홀드/레그홀드; 끈끈이판; 롱 스프링; 자동 복귀형; 올무; 기타
nb: Type dyrefelle: Slagfelle/Conibear; Boks; Bur/levende; Spiralfjær; Koloni; Fotsnare/beinsnare; Limfelle; Lang fjær; Selvtilbakestillende; Snare; Annet
zh-CN: 捕猎工具类型: 抓身陷阱/Conibear 陷阱; 箱式陷阱; 笼式/活捉陷阱; 螺旋弹簧陷阱; 群捕陷阱; 抓脚/套腿陷阱; 粘板; 长弹簧陷阱; 自复位陷阱; 套索; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de armadilha para animais: Bodygrip/Conibear; Caixa; Gaiola/captura viva; Mola helicoidal; Colônia; Armadilha de pata; Placa de cola; Mola longa; Rearme automático; Laço; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta zamke za životinje: Bodygrip/Conibear; Kutija; Kavez / hvatanje živih životinja; Zavojna opruga; Kolonija; Klopka za nogu; Ploča s ljepilom; Duga opruga; Samoresetirajući; Zamka; Ostalo
ru: Тип ловушки для животных: Проходной (Conibear); Ящичный; Клеточный/живоловка; С витой пружиной; Многоместный; Следовой; Клеевая доска; С пластинчатой пружиной; С самовозвратом; Силок; Другое
de: Tierfallenart: Totschlagfalle/Conibear; Kasten; Käfig-/Lebendfalle; Spiralfeder; Koloniefalle; Fuß-/Beinfalle; Klebefalle; Langfeder; Selbstrückstellend; Schlinge; Sonstige